test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_CNJ_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: waabmisnokwaaba   #3pl v 2sg !predict this, book totally unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnogba         #3sg v 2sg !predict this
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmigsiiwmba         #3sg v 2sg !book has this, is unsure
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig+Dub: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+4O: waabmaasiigwaawenh   #3pl v 3obv 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+4O:    waabmaasiigwenh #3sg v 3obv  

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+1SgO: waabmisiigwaawenh   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmisiigwenh         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+4+3PlO: waabmigsiigwaawenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigsiigwaawenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+4+3SgO:    waabmigsiigwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigsiigwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+2SgO: waabmisnokwaawenh   #3pl v 2sg !book omits form
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmisnogwenh         #3sg v 2sg !book omits form
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1PlO: waabmiyaang          #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1PlO: waabmiyaang          #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1SgO: waabmiyeg            #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiyan            #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigyaanh     #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigyaang     #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigyang      #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigyeg       #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigyan       #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigooyeg       #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigooyan       #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: waabminnagog        #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2SgO:    waabminnaa          #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_  (3 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+1PlO: waabmiyngidwaa      #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmiyngid         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+21PlO: waabminnangwaa   #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+21PlO:    waabminnang      #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+2PlO:   waabminnegwaa    #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+2PlO:      waabminneg       #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmangdwaa   #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmangid     #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmagwaa     #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmag        #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+21Pl+3PlO: waabmangwaa    #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmang       #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmegwaa     #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmeg        #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmadwaa     #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmad        #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_  (3 obj)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: waabmiyngidwaaba   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmiyngidba         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+21PlO: waabminnangwaaba  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+21PlO:    waabminnangba     #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+2PlO:   waabminnegwaaba     #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+2PlO:      waabminnegba           #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmangdwaaba  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmangdiba    #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmagwaaba  #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmagba     #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+21Pl+3PlO: waabmangwaaba  #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmangba    #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmegwaaba  #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmegba    #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmadwaaba  #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmadba    #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin  (2 obj)
     #      -_->aa  (3 obj) 

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+1PlO: waabmiwngidwaawenh   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+1PlO:    waabmiwngidenh       #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+21PlO: waabminnangwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+21PlO: waabminnankwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl !book
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+21PlO:    waabminnangwenh     #3sg v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+2PlO:   waabminnegwaawenh     #3pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+2PlO:      waabminnegwenh           #3sg v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+3PlO:   waabmaawngidwaawenh  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+3SgO:      waabmaawngidenh    #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlO:      waabmaawgwaawenh  #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgO:         waabmaawgenh     #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+21Pl+3PlO: waabmaawngwaawenh  #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+21Pl+3SgO:    waabmaawngwenh    #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlO:   waabmaawegwaawenh  #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgO:      waabmaawegwenh    #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlO:      waabmaawdwaawenh  #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgO:         waabmaawdenh    #2sg v 3sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1PlO: waabmiyaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1PlO: waabmiyaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: waabmiyegba   #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiymba    #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigyaangba #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigyaambaanh    #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigyangba #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigyegba    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigyamba    #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigooyegba #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigooymba #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: waabminnaggoba #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    waabminnaambaanh     #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1PlO: waabmiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1PlO: waabmiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1SgO: waabmiwegwenh    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiwnenh    #2sg v 1sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:    waabmiwne       #2sg v 1sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigwaanenh    #0 v 1sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1SgO:      waabmigwaane    #0 v 1sg !book (?)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1PlO:   waabmigwaangenh #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+21PlO: waabmigwangwenh #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2PlO:   waabmigwegwenh    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigwanenh       #0 v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2SgO:      waabmigwanen       #0 v 2sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+2PlO: waabmigoowegwenh #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigoownenh    #1pl v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+2SgO:    waabmigoownen    #1pl v 2sg !book

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: waabminnaggwenh #1sg v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2SgO:    waabminnaanenh      #1sg v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2SgO:    waabminnaanen      #1sg v 2sg !cons (?)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+4O: waabmaawaad        #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+4O:    waabmaad           #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+1SgO: waabmiwaad           #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmid              #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+4+3PlO: waabmigwaad        #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigwaad        #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+4+3SgO:    waabmigod          #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigod          #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+2SgO: waabmikwaa          #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmik             #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+4O: waabmaawaapa  #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+4O:    waabmaapa        #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: waabmiwaapa   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmipa         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+4+3PlO: waabmigwaapa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigwaapa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+4+3SgO:    waabmigpa      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigpa      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: waabmikwaaba   #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmikba         #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig+Dub: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+4O: waabmaawaagwenh #3pl v 3obv !book provides nothing, this is best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+4O:    waabmaagwenh    #3sg v 3obv

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+1SgO: waabmiwaagwenh   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+1SgO:    waabmigwenh         #3sg v 1sg
